Nevada, session 83, AB327.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Legislative Auditor shall conduct an audit
of the financial management and employment practices of Vegas
PBS. The audit of Vegas PBS must include, without limitation, a
focus on the budget, hiring practices and any other relevant matters
deemed necessary by the Legislative Commission.
2. The Legislative Auditor shall conduct an audit of the
distribution of grants from the Department of Education to public
broadcasting organizations. The audit of the Department of
Education must include, without limitation, an analysis of the
distribution of grants and the historical increases of the grants to
each public broadcasting organization and any other relevant
matters deemed necessary by the Legislative Commission.
3. On or before January 31, 2027, the Legislative Auditor shall
present a final written report of the audit conducted pursuant to this
section to the Audit Subcommittee of the Legislative Commission
created by NRS 218E.240.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB327*